Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.070

Committee's duties with respect to data processing capability for fiscal matters—LEAP defined.

The committee shall acquire a data processing service capability under the exclusive jurisdiction and control of the legislature acting through the committee and its administrator for the purpose of providing the legislature and its staff with the type of information required for in-depth analysis and monitoring of state agency expenditures, budgets, and related fiscal matters. The legislative evaluation and accountability program established in this section may be referred to in this chapter as the LEAP administration.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 7.]